Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1031YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 17 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 903B.11 Surgical castration ââ 1 certain sex offenses. 2 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 3 contrary and in addition to any other punishment provided by 4 law, a person who has been convicted of a serious sex offense, 5 as defined in section 903B.10, subsection 3, occurring on or 6 after the effective date of this section, in which the victim 7 was under the age of twelve at the time of the offense, may be 8 ordered by the court to undergo surgical castration as part of 9 any conditions of release imposed by the court or the board of 10 parole. This section shall not apply if the person voluntarily 11 undergoes a permanent surgical alternative approved by the 12 court or the board of parole. 13 2. If a person is placed on probation and is not in 14 confinement at the time of sentencing, the presentence 15 investigation shall include a plan for surgical castration to 16 be performed as soon as is reasonably possible after the person 17 is sentenced. If the person is in confinement prior to release 18 on probation or parole, surgical castration shall be performed 19 not later than one week prior to the defendantâs release 20 from confinement. Conviction of a serious sex offense shall 21 constitute exceptional circumstances warranting a presentence 22 investigation under section 901.2. 23 3. An order of the court requiring a person to undergo 24 surgical castration shall be contingent upon a determination 25 by a court-appointed medical expert that the person is an 26 appropriate candidate for the procedure and that the procedure 27 is medically appropriate. This determination shall be made not 28 later than sixty days from the imposition of sentence. 29 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 30 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 31